Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5247HV (2) 91 je/ns H.F. 2487 Section 1. Section 19.3, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 1 to read as follows: 2 1. a. Any person may notify the attorney general of a state 3 entityâs potential violation of section 19.2 . The attorney 4 general may bring an action against a state entity for a writ 5 of mandamus to compel the state entity to comply with section 6 19.2 . 7 b. The attorney general may conduct an inquiry or 8 investigation regarding a violation of this chapter. As part 9 of that inquiry or investigation, and in accordance with the 10 Iowa rules of civil procedure, the attorney general may issue 11 a subpoena for the production of records, including but not 12 limited to books, accounts, papers, correspondence, memoranda, 13 files, or other documents in a print or electronic format. If 14 a person refuses compliance, the attorney general may seek 15 enforcement by the district court. 16 c. Notwithstanding section 13.7, the attorney general may 17 contract with special counsel to assist in either or both the 18 investigation and legal action against a state entity for an 19 alleged violation of this chapter. The state entity shall 20 reimburse the attorney general for the costs, expenses, and 21 fees incurred by special counsel. 22 Sec. 2. Section 261J.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 23 follows: 24 261J.5 Enforcement. 25 1. Any person may notify the attorney general of a public 26 institution of higher educationâs potential violation of 27 section 261J.2 . The attorney general may bring an action 28 against a public institution of higher education for a writ of 29 mandamus to compel the public institution of higher education 30 to comply with section 261J.2 . 31 2. The attorney general may conduct an inquiry or 32 investigation regarding a violation of this chapter. As part 33 of that inquiry or investigation, and in accordance with the 34 Iowa rules of civil procedure, the attorney general may issue 35 -1- LSB 5247HV (2) 91 je/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 2487 a subpoena for the production of records, including but not 1 limited to books, accounts, papers, correspondence, memoranda, 2 files, or other documents in a print or electronic format. If 3 a person refuses compliance, the attorney general may seek 4 enforcement by the district court. 5 3. Notwithstanding section 13.7, the attorney general may 6 contract with special counsel to assist in either or both the 7 investigation and legal action against a public institution 8 of higher education for an alleged violation of this chapter. 9 The public institution of higher education shall reimburse the 10 attorney general for the costs, expenses, and fees incurred by 11 special counsel. 12 Sec. 3. REVIEW OF UNDERGRADUATE GENERAL EDUCATION 13 REQUIREMENTS AND CORE CURRICULA. By the semester beginning 14 fall 2028, the state board of regents shall conduct a review 15 of all undergraduate general education requirements and 16 core curricula at institutions of higher education governed 17 by the board. For the review, the board shall direct the 18 institutions to review and identify any required courses or 19 course requirements that include diversity, equity, inclusion, 20 and critical race theory-related content. The board in its 21 discretion shall direct an institution to eliminate such a 22 course or course requirement. 23 Sec. 4. ESTABLISHMENT OF POLICIES ââ DATE. The board of 24 regents shall establish all policies required by this Act no 25 later than December 31, 2026. 26